bg-BG: Тип лагер: С ъглов контакт; Конусен; Хибриден керамичен; Насипни сачми; Иглен; Капсулован; Друго
de: Lagertyp: Schrägkugellager; Konuslager; Hybrid-Keramik; Lose Kugeln; Nadellager; Gekapseltes Industrielager; Sonstige
tr: Rulman tipi: Eğik bilyalı; Çanak ve koni; Hibrit seramik; Serbest bilye; İğneli; Kapalı kartuş; Diğer
el: Τύπος ρουλεμάν: Γωνιακής επαφής; Κώνου-ποτηριού; Υβριδικό κεραμικό; Χύμα μπίλιες; Βελονοειδές; Σφραγισμένης κασέτας; Άλλο
ru: Тип подшипника: Радиально-упорный; Конус-чашка; Гибридный керамический; Насыпной; Игольчатый; Закрытый картриджный; Другое
ro-RO: Tipul rulmentului: Contact unghiular; Con și cuvetă; Hibrid ceramic; Bile libere; Cu ace; Cartuș sigilat; Altele
ja: ベアリングタイプ: アンギュラコンタクト; カップアンドコーン; ハイブリッドセラミック; ルーズボール; ニードル; シールドカートリッジ; その他
es: Tipo de rodamiento: Contacto angular; Copa y cono; Cerámica híbrida; Bolas sueltas; De agujas; Cartucho sellado; Otro
hu: Csapágytípus: Ferde hatásvonalú; Kónuszos; Hibrid kerámia; Szabadgolyós; Tűgörgős; Zárt patronos; Egyéb
da: Lejetype: Vinkelkontakt; Cup og cone; Keramisk hybrid; Løs kugle; Nål; Lukket kassette; Anden
hr-HR: Vrsta ležaja: Kutni kontakt; Čašica i konus; Hibridno keramički; Slobodne kuglice; Igličasti; Zapečaćeni uložak; Ostalo
lt-LT: Guolio tipas: Kampinio kontakto; Kūginis („Cup and cone“); Hibridinis keraminis; Laisvų rutuliukų; Adatinis; Sandari kasetė; Kita
vi: Loại ổ trục: Tiếp xúc góc; Chén và côn; Gốm lai; Bi rời; Bi kim; Cartridge bọc kín; Khác
it: Tipo di cuscinetto: A contatto obliquo; A coppa e cono; Ceramico ibrido; A sfere libere; A rullini; Cartuccia sigillata; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta ležaja: S poševnim dotikom; Konusni; Hibridni keramični; Kroglice; Iglični; Zaprt kartušni; Drugo
nl: Lager type: Hoekcontact; Cup en conus; Keramisch hybride; Losse kogel; Naald; Gesloten cartridge; Overig
pl: Typ łożyska: Skośne; Kulkowo-stożkowe; Hybrydowe ceramiczne; Z kulkami luzem; Igiełkowe; Maszynowe uszczelnione; Inne
fr: Type de roulement: Contact oblique; Cuvette et cône; Céramique hybride; Billes libres; Aiguille; Cartouche étanche; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de rolamento: Contacto angular; Copo e cone; Cerâmica híbrida; Esferas soltas; Agulha; Cartucho selado; Outro
fi: Laakerityyppi: Viistokuulalaakeri; Kartiolaakeri; Keraaminen hybridilaakeri; Irtokuulalaakeri; Neulalaakeri; Tiivistetty kasettilaakeri; Muu
zh-CN: 轴承类型: 角接触; 珠挡式; 混合陶瓷; 散珠; 滚针; 密封盒式; 其他
cs: Typ ložiska: S kosoúhlým stykem; Kónusové; Hybridní keramické; Volné kuličky; Jehlové; Zapouzdřené ložisko; Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de rolamento: Contato angular; Capa e cone; Cerâmica híbrida; Esfera solta; Agulha; Cartucho selado; Outros
ko: 베어링 유형: 앵귤러 콘택트; 컵 앤 콘; 하이브리드 세라믹; 루즈 볼; 니들; 실드 카트리지; 기타
zh-TW: 軸承類型: 角接觸; 碗錐式; 混合陶瓷; 散珠; 滾針; 密封匣式; 其他
sv: Lagertyp: Vinkelkontakt; Kona och skål; Hybridkeramisk; Lösa kulor; Nållager; Kapslat lager; Övrigt
en: Bearing type: Angular contact; Cup and cone; Hybrid ceramic; Loose ball; Needle; Sealed cartridge; Other
sk-SK: Typ ložiska: S kosouhlým stykom; Kužeľové; Hybridné keramické; Voľné guľôčkové; Ihlové; Utesnené kazetové; Iné
nb: Lagertype: Vinkelkontakt; Kopp og konus; Hybridkeramisk; Løse kuler; Nål; Forseglet patron; Annet
th: ประเภทตลับลูกปืน: แองกูลาร์คอนแทค; เบ้าและกรวย; เซรามิกไฮบริด; ลูกปืนเม็ด; เข็ม; ตลับแบบซีล; อื่นๆ